Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB274.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 407.440 is amended to read as follows:
If the secretary for the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or his or her authorized
representative is of the opinion that a support order is erroneous and presents a question
of law warranting an appeal in the public interest, he or she may perfect an appeal to the
proper appellate court if the support order was issued by a court of this state, or if the
support order was issued in another state, cause the appeal to be taken in the other state.
In either case, expenses of appeal may be paid on his or her order from funds
appropriated for his or her office.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/3/2025 11:45 AM Jacketed